Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB983.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial/industrial rooftop." The rooftop of any building that is a nonresidential building."Commercial/industrial rooftop solar project." A solar energy generation system with a nameplate capacity of not larger than three megawatts as measured in alternating current located 1234567891011121314151617 on a commercial/industrial rooftop."Commercial/industrial rooftop solar project generator." A nonutility owner or operator of a commercial/industrial rooftop solar project."Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Electric distribution company" or "EDC." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions).Section 3. Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program.(a) Program.--The commission shall establish the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program to implement the provisions of this act.(b) Payments.--An electric distribution company shall provide, on a monthly basis, payment to any commercial/industrial rooftop solar project generator equal to the full value of electricity generated by the commercial/industrial rooftop solar project and exported to the EDC. The payment shall be calculated by multiplying the metered output of the commercial/industrial rooftop solar project in kilowatt hours by the EDC's nonhourly price-to-compare rate applicable to small commercial customers for the month during which the generation occurred, regardless of the distribution service voltage, rate classification, utility meter type or size or service type of the commercial/industrial rooftop solar project.(c) Onsite usage not required.--In order to qualify for the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program, a commercial/industrial rooftop solar project:(1) may export the entirety of the project's energy generation to the EDC; and(2) is not required to devote any of the project's 20250SB0983PN1125 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 energy generation to onsite usage.(d) Duration of payments.--A commercial/industrial rooftop solar project shall be entitled to receive payments under subsection (b) for the duration of the project's serviceable life.(e) Maximizing usable project space.--A commercial/industrial rooftop solar project may be built to maximize the usable space of a commercial/industrial rooftop and shall not be limited in size or scope based on the building's onsite electricity usage.(f) Multiple projects allowed.--A commercial/industrial rooftop solar project generator shall be permitted to own or operate multiple commercial/industrial rooftop solar projects on the same or adjacent commercial/industrial rooftop or parcels with aggregated nameplate capacity of three megawatts or greater as measured in alternating current so long as each commercial/industrial rooftop solar project:(1) is individually metered;(2) does not exceed three megawatts in capacity as measured in alternating current; and(3) is subject to a distinct interconnection agreement.(g) Alternative energy credits.--(1) A commercial/industrial rooftop solar project generator is eligible to receive alternative energy credits under the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, so long as the generator's commercial/industrial rooftop solar project is generating and exporting energy to the EDC.(2) A commercial/industrial rooftop solar project generator shall be entitled to retain, retire or sell all 20250SB0983PN1125 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alternative energy credits received from the operation of a commercial/industrial rooftop solar project.(3) A commercial/industrial rooftop solar project shall be certified for alternative energy credits pursuant to the procedures and standards provided in the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act and the related regulations promulgated by the commission.(h) Interconnection of projects.--The interconnection of commercial/industrial rooftop solar projects shall proceed pursuant to the existing interconnection procedures and standards promulgated by the commission, except to the extent inconsistent with this section. The electric distribution company must give interconnection approval to any commercial/industrial rooftop solar project that meets the requirements specified in this section.(i) Commission approval of commercial/industrial rooftop solar projects.--The commission shall approve an application for a commercial/industrial rooftop solar project for participation in the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program if it meets all of the requirements specified in this section, to which the following shall apply:(1) Within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall establish a process for the owner or operator of a proposed commercial/industrial rooftop solar project to submit applications with satisfactory proof that the proposed project meets all of the necessary requirements specified in this section.(2) The commission shall approve or deny an application for participation in the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program within 30 days from the date of the commission's 20250SB0983PN1125 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receipt of the application unless, by written order providing reasons, the 30-day consideration period is extended, which may not exceed 30 additional days. The commission may not extend the 30-day period more than once.(3) Within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall establish a process by which an owner or operator of a proposed commercial/industrial rooftop solar project may petition for reconsideration of a rejected application.(j) Required wages and employee benefits.--(1) No less than the prevailing minimum wages and employee benefits as would be applicable to a project of public work under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, shall be paid to each workman employed on a commercial/industrial rooftop solar project if the following apply after the effective date of this paragraph:(i) the project has a maximum net output of greater than one megawatt as measured in alternating current;(ii) the project exports electricity to the EDC; and(iii) the project receives compensation under the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program.(2) As used in this section, the terms "public work" and "workman" shall be as defined in section 2(5) and (7) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(k) Right of project.--An owner of a net metered solar energy project that is located or is to be located on a commercial/industrial rooftop and that has paid a deposit to an electric distribution company, has entered into an executed interconnection agreement with the electric distribution company 20250SB0983PN1125 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or has obtained customer-generator approval from the commission before the effective date of any law, regulation or judicial opinion that repeals, modifies or replaces the existing net metering program shall have the right to:(1) continue to net-meter the project and receive compensation for excess generation under the terms, conditions and standards under the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act as they existed prior to the law, regulation or judicial opinion that repeals, modifies or replaces the existing net metering program; or(2) participate in the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program.(l) Participation in program.--A solar project located or to be located on a commercial/industrial rooftop that submitted an interconnection application to the electric distribution company prior to the effective date of this subsection and that meets the requirements of this act shall have the right to participate in the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program.Section 4. Regulations.Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, the commission shall promulgate regulations to implement the Commercial/Industrial Rooftop Solar Program in accordance with this act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0983PN1125 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425